en: corn kernel, corn kernels
da: majskjerner
de: Maiskörner
es: grano de maís, grano de maiz
fi: maissinjyvä, maissinjyviä
fr: grains de maïs
hr: zrno kukuruza
it: chicci di mais
nb: majskjerner
nl: maïskorrels
pl: ziarna kukurydzy, ziarno kukurydzy
pt: grão de milho, grao de milho
sr: kukuruzni griz
sv: majskärnor, majskorn

fr: maïs doux en grains, grains de mais doux
nl: zoete maïskorrels
pt: milho doce em grão

fr: maïs moulu
fi: maissirouhe
nl: gemalen maïs
pt: milho moído

en: popcorn
de: Popkorn
fr: Popcorn
hr: kukuruz kokičar
it: popcorn
nl: Popcorn

en: extruded corn, corn extrudate
ca: extrudit de blat de moro
es: maíz extruido, extruido de maíz
fr: maïs extrudé, extrudat de maïs
hr: ekstrudirani kukuruz
it: mais estruso

en: rice
af: Rys
am: ሩዝ
an: Roz
ar: أرز
as: ধান
az: Düyü
ba: Дөгө
be: Рыс
bg: ориз
bm: malo
bn: চাল
bo: འབྲས།
br: Riz
bs: Riža
ca: arròs
ce: Дуга
ch: Ineksa
co: risu
cs: rýže, rýže a obilniny
cv: Рис
cy: reis
da: ris
de: Reis
dv: ހަނޑޫ
el: Ρύζι
eo: rizo
es: arroz
et: riis
eu: Arroz
fa: برنج
fi: riisi
fo: Rís
fr: riz, riz cru
fy: rys
ga: Rís
gl: Arroz
ha: Shinkafa
he: אורז
hi: चावल
hr: riža, riže
ht: Diri
hu: rizs
hy: բրինձ
id: beras
ig: Oskàpà
ii: ꍯ
io: Rizo
is: Hrísgrjón
it: riso
ja: 米, ご飯
jv: Pantun
ka: ბრინჯი
kk: Күріш
km: ស្រូវ
kn: ಅಕ್ಕಿ
ko: 쌀
ku: Riz
kw: rys
ky: шалы
la: Oryza
lb: Räis
li: ries
ln: Lɔ́sɔ
lo: ເຂົ້າຈ້າວ
lt: Ryžis
lv: rīsi
mg: Vary
mi: raihi
mk: ориз
ml: അരി
mn: Тутарга
mr: तांदूळ
ms: Beras
mt: ross
my: စပါး
nb: ris
ne: धान
nl: rijst
nn: ris
nv: Alóós
oc: Ris
or: ଚାଉଳ
os: Пырындз
pa: ਝੋਨਾ
pl: ryż, ryżu, ryżowa, ryżowe, ryżowy
pt: arroz
qu: Arrus
rn: Umuceri
ro: orez
ru: рис
rw: Umuceli
sa: तण्डुलाः
sd: چانور
se: riisa
sh: Riža
si: වී
sk: Ryža
sl: Riž
sn: Mupunga
so: Bariis
sq: orizi
sr: пиринач
st: raese
su: Béas
sv: ris, risgryn
sw: Mpunga
ta: நெல்
te: వరి
tg: биринҷ
th: ข้าว
tk: bürünç
tl: Palay
tm: Pirinç
tr: pirinç
tt: дөге
uk: рис
ur: چاول
uz: Guruch
vi: Gạo
vo: risat
wa: Riz
wo: ceeb
yi: רייז
za: Haeuxbieg
zh: 稻
zu: ilayisi

en: rice protein, rice proteins
bg: оризов протеин
cs: rýžová bílkovina
da: risprotein, ris protein
de: Reiseiweiß, Reisprotein
es: proteinas de arroz
fi: riisiproteiini
fr: protéine de riz, protéines de riz
hr: bjelančevine riže
hu: rizsfehérje
it: proteine del riso, proteine di riso, proteina del riso
nl: rijsteiwit
pl: białko ryżowe, białko z ryżu

en: whole rice protein
de: Vollkornreisprotein
hr: proteina cijele riže
it: proteine di riso integrale
pl: białko brązowego ryżu

en: concentrated rice protein, concentrated rice proteins
it: concentrato di proteine del riso, concentrato di proteine di riso, concentrato di proteina del riso, concentrato di proteina di riso

en: rice base
de: Reisbasis
es: base de arroz
fr: base de riz
it: base de riso
nl: rijstbasis
sv: risbas

en: rice groats
hr: rižina krupica
it: chicchi di riso

en: rice from Italy, Italian rice
de: italien. Reis
es: arroz italiano
fi: Italialainen riisi
fr: riz d'Italie, riz italien
hr: riža iz italije
hu: olasz rizs
it: riso italiano
nl: rijst uit Italië, italiaanse rijst
pl: ryż włoski
ro: orez italian

en: parboiled rice
ca: arròs precuit, arròs vaporitzat
de: parboiled Reis
es: arroz precocido, arroz vaporizado
fi: parboil-käsitelty riisi
fr: riz étuvé, riz parboiled
hr: prokuhana riža
hu: forrázott rizs, előfőzött rizs
it: riso parboiled
nl: parboiled rijst, voorgekookte rijst
pl: ryż preparowany termicznie, ryż parboiled
pt: arroz parboilizado. arroz estufado

en: glutinous rice
ar: الأرز الدبق
as: বৰা
bn: চটচটে চাল
ca: arròs glutinós, arròs enganxós
cs: lepkavá rýže
da: klæberis
de: Klebreis, klebrigen Reis
eo: glueca rizo
es: arroz glutinoso, arroz pegajoso
eu: arroz likatsu
fa: برنج چسبناک
fi: tahmea riisi
fr: riz gluant
gl: arroz glutinoso
he: אורז דביק
hr: ljepljiva riža
hu: ragacsos rizs
id: beras ketan
it: riso glutinoso
ja: もち米
ko: 찹쌀
lo: ເຂົ້າຫນຽວ
lv: lipīgie rīsi
ms: pulut
my: ကောက်ညှင်း
nb: kleberis
nl: plakrijst, kleverige rijst, kleefrijst, ketan rijst, ketanrijst
pl: ryż kleisty
pt: arroz glutinoso, arroz empapado
ru: kлейкий рис
su: béas ketan
sv: klibbris
th: ข้าวเหนียว
tl: malagkit
tr: yapışkan pirinç
uk: kлейкий рис
vi: gạo nếp
zh: 糯稻

en: semi-whole rice, semi-wholemeal rice
fr: riz semi-complet

en: whole grain rice, full grain rice, wholegrain rice, whole rice
da: fuldkornsris
de: Vollkornreis
fi: täysjyväriisi
fr: riz complet
nl: volkorenrijst
nn: fullkornris
sv: fullkornris

en: brown rice
ar: أرز أسمر
bg: кафяв ориз
ca: arròs integral
cs: celozrnná rýže, hnědá rýže
da: brunt ris, brune ris
de: brauner Reis
es: arroz integral
fi: tumma riisi
fr: riz brun
hr: smeđa riža
hu: barna rizs, barnarizs, teljes kiőrlésű rizs, teljes értékű rizs
it: riso integrale
ja: 玄米
nl: zilvervliesrijst, bruine rijst
nn: brune ris
pl: ryż brązowy
pt: arroz integral
ru: kоричневый рис
sl: rjavi riž
sv: brunt ris, råris
th: ข้าวกล้อง

en: whole grain brown rice, wholegrain brown rice
bg: кафяв пълнозърнест ориз
de: brauner Vollkornreis
fi: ruskea kokojyväriisi
fr: riz brun complet
hr: integralna smeđa riža
nl: volkoren rijst
nn: brune fullkornris
sv: brunt fullkornris

en: organic brown rice, organic full grain rice
bg: био кафяв ориз, био кафяв пълнозърнест ориз
fi: luomu tumma riisi, luomu täysjyväriisi
fr: riz complet bio, riz complet biologique, riz complet issu de l'agriculture biologique
hr: organska smeđa riža
hu: bio barnarizs, bio barna rizs
it: riso integrale biologico
nl: biozilvervliesrijst

en: precooked parboiled whole grain brown rice
de: Vorgekochter geschälter brauner Vollkornreis
fr: Riz brun complet étuvé pré-cuit
hr: prethodno kuhana prokuhana smeđa riža od cijelog zrna
it: riso integrale parboiled precotto